South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3133.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-4530 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-5-4530. (A) Either a tail lamp or a separate lamp shall be so constructed and placed as to illuminate with a white light the rear registrationlicense plate and render it clearly legible from a distance of fifty feet to the rear.  Any tail lamp or tail lamps, together with any separate lamp for illuminating the rear registration plate, shall be so wired as to be lighted whenever the head lamps or auxiliary driving lamps are lighted. (B) A law enforcement officer may not stop a driver of a motor vehicle whose tail lamp or separate lamp is inoperable in the absence of a violation of another motor vehicle law. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----